Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Admission of Members

§ 17-19-601.
Admission.

The articles or bylaws may establish criteria or procedures for admission of members.

No person shall be admitted as a member without his consent.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-602.
Consideration.

Except as provided in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may admit members for no consideration or for any consideration as is determined by the board.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-603.
No requirement of members.

A corporation is not required to have members.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.